Louisiana, session 2026, HB929.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1902(A)(12), 1964(31), and 1964.1 are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§1902. Transacting a business of insurance by unauthorized insurer defined
A. Any of the following acts in this state, effected by mail or otherwise, by
an unauthorized insurer or by any person acting with actual or apparent authority of
the insurer, on behalf of the insurer, is deemed to constitute the transaction of an
insurance business in or from this state:
* * *
(12) The repair or replacement of motor vehicle glass which is done in a
manner that violates R.S. 22:1964.1.
* * *
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 929 ENROLLED
§1964. Methods, acts, and practices which are defined as unfair or deceptive
The following are declared to be unfair methods of competition and unfair
or deceptive acts or practices in the business of insurance:
* * *
(31) Any violation of R.S. 22:1964.1, regarding the repair or replacement of
motor vehicle glass.
§1964.1. Louisiana Motor Vehicle Glass Law; unfair insurance trade practice;
prohibited acts; violations and penalties
A. As used in this Part, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed
to them in this Section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Advanced driver assistance system" means any motor vehicle electronic
safety system, as detailed in the applicable version of SAE International's SAE J3016
Levels of Driving Automation, or its relevant successor, that is designed to support
the driver and motor vehicle in a manner intended to increase motor vehicle safety
and reduce losses associated with motor vehicle crashes.
(2) "Motor vehicle glass" means the glass and non-glass parts associated
with the replacement of the glass used in the windshield, doors, or windows of a
motor vehicle.
(3) "Motor vehicle glass repair shop" means any person, including the
person's employees and agents, that for compensation engages in the repair or
replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass.
(4) "Repair or replacement of motor vehicle glass" means and includes but
is not limited to the inspection, repairing, restoring, or replacing of damaged motor
vehicle glass and the calibrating or recalibrating of an advanced driver assistance
system when an incident requires the replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass.
B. A motor vehicle glass repair shop or any other person who is
compensated for the solicitation of insurance claims shall not engage in any of the
following unfair trade practices:
(1) Offer a rebate, gift, gift card, cash, coupon, fee, prize, bonus, payment,
incentive, inducement, or any other thing of value to any insured, insurance
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 929 ENROLLED
producer, or other person in exchange for directing or making a claim under a motor
vehicle insurance policy for a repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass.
(2) Charge fees and costs to an insured for the repair or replacement of
damaged motor vehicle glass, including but not limited to the calibration or
recalibration of an advanced driver assistance system, which are higher than those
fees and costs reasonably and customarily charged in this state.
(3) Submit false, misleading, or incomplete documentation or information
to an insured or an insured's insurer, including any agent of the insured or insurer,
for a repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass.
(4) Advise an insured to falsify the date of damage or to misrepresent the
geographical area where the repair or replacement work was conducted, in relation
to an insured's claim or potential claim for the repair or replacement of damaged
motor vehicle glass, which results or would result in a higher insurance payment or
a change in insurance coverage status.
(5) Falsely sign a work order or other insurance-related form relating to an
insured's claim, or potential claim, for a repair or replacement of damaged motor
vehicle glass.
(6) Misrepresent to an insured or the insured's insurer, including any agent
of the insured or insurer, the price of a proposed repair or replacement of damaged
motor vehicle glass.
(7) State that an insured's insurer has approved a repair or replacement of
damaged motor vehicle glass without verifying coverage directly with, or obtaining
approval directly from, the insurer or the insurer's agent and obtaining confirmation
of the coverage or approval by written or recorded communication.
(8) State that a repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass will
be paid for entirely by an insurer and at no cost to the insured unless the coverage
has been verified by the insurer or the insurer's agent.
(9) Do any of the following relative to an insured's claim or potential claim
for the repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass:
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 929 ENROLLED
(a) Damage, or encourage an insured to damage, the motor vehicle in order
to increase the scope of the repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass.
(b) Perform work that is clearly and substantially beyond the level of work
necessary to restore the motor vehicle to a safe pre-damaged condition in accordance
with accepted or approved reasonable and customary techniques for the repair or
replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass.
(c) Misrepresent the motor vehicle glass repair shop's relationship to an
insured or the insured's agent.
(d) Perform any other act that constitutes fraud or misrepresentation.
(10) Contract with a person for the repair or replacement of damaged motor
vehicle glass to be paid for pursuant to a first-party insurance policy until all of the
following qualifications have been satisfied:
(a) The person has made a first-party claim for the repair or replacement of
damaged motor vehicle glass pursuant to a motor vehicle insurance policy.
(b) The motor vehicle glass repair shop has received a claim or referral
number for the claim referenced in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph.
(c) The motor vehicle glass repair shop has provided written notification to
the insured regarding the presence of an advanced driver assistance system in the
motor vehicle. If such a system is present, the motor vehicle glass repair shop shall
do all the following:
(i) Notify the insured, in writing, whether calibration or recalibration of the
motor vehicle's advanced driver assistance system is needed after a motor vehicle
glass repair or replacement as recommended by the vehicle manufacturer.
(ii) Notify the insured, in writing, whether the motor vehicle glass repair
shop intends to calibrate or recalibrate the advanced driver assistance system in a
manner that meets the motor vehicle manufacturer's specifications.
(iii) Notify the insured, in writing, that the motor vehicle should be taken to
the vehicle manufacturer's certified dealership or a qualified specialist capable of
performing the calibration or recalibration if the motor vehicle glass repair shop is
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 929 ENROLLED
not capable of performing or does not intend to perform a calibration or recalibration
as described in Item (ii) of this Subparagraph.
(11) Calibrate or recalibrate a motor vehicle's advanced driver assistance
system without providing written notice to the insured upon completion as to
whether the calibration or recalibration was successful according to the motor
vehicle manufacturer's specifications and as to whether the motor vehicle should be
taken to the vehicle manufacturer's certified dealership or a qualified specialist if the
calibration or recalibration was not successful.
(12)(a) Repair or replace damaged motor vehicle glass without first
providing the insured a written, good faith estimate of the fees and costs that are
anticipated to be charged to the insured by the motor vehicle glass repair shop.
(b) Notwithstanding Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph, a motor vehicle
glass repair shop shall provide the insured an itemized invoice and receipt upon
payment for the completion of the repair or replacement of the damaged motor
vehicle glass.
C. A motor vehicle glass repair shop that either knowingly, regularly, or
consistently engages in any of the acts prohibited by Subsection B of this Section
shall be deemed to be engaged or engaging in an unfair trade practice in the business
of insurance and shall be in violation of and subject to the penalties provided for in
this Part.
D. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit an insurer or
producer from engaging in any of the following business practices:
(1) Recommending a motor vehicle glass repair shop to an insured.
However, an insured that makes a first-party claim for the repair or replacement of
damaged motor vehicle glass pursuant to a motor vehicle insurance policy shall not
be required to use a particular motor vehicle glass repair shop or recalibration facility
to receive claim payments or other policy benefits.
(2) Providing an explanation to an insured of available coverage or
applicable liability limits pursuant to any insurance policy.
(3) Maintaining a network of motor vehicle glass repair shops.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 929 ENROLLED
E.(1) An insured shall not, either prior to or after a claim or covered loss,
assign, delegate, or transfer, in whole or in part, to any other person the insured's
duties, rights, or benefits pursuant to an insurance policy covering the repair or
replacement of motor vehicle glass.
(2) Any contract entered into in violation of this Subsection shall be void and
unenforceable. However, nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to prohibit
an insured from authorizing, directing payment to, or paying a person for services,
materials, or any other thing which may be or is covered pursuant to an insurance
policy covering the repair or replacement of motor vehicle glass.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.